test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-wapahta_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - wâpahta -  : # Ordinary TA verb - full paradigm
  
     wâpahta+V+TI: wâpahta
     wâpahta+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: wâpahta
     wâpahta+V+TI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: wâpahtaetân
     wâpahta+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: wâpahtamok
     wâpahta+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Sg: wâpahtamôhkan
     wâpahta+V+TI+Imp+Del+12Pl: wâpahtamôhkahk
     wâpahta+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Pl: wâpahtamôhkêk

     wâpahta+V+TI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: niwâpahtên
     wâpahta+V+TI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kiwâpahtên
     wâpahta+V+TI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: niwâpahtênân
     wâpahta+V+TI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: kiwâpahtênaw, kiwâpahtênânaw
     wâpahta+V+TI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kiwâpahtênâwâw
     wâpahta+V+TI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: wâpahtam
     wâpahta+V+TI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: wâpahtamwak
     wâpahta+V+TI+Ind+Prs+4Pl: wâpahtamiyiwa

     wâpahta+V+TI+Ind+Prt+1Sg: nikîwâpahtên, nikî-wâpahtên
     wâpahta+V+TI+Ind+Prt+2Sg: kikîwâpahtên, kikî-wâpahtên
     wâpahta+V+TI+Ind+Prt+1Pl: nikîwâpahtênân, nikî-wâpahtênân
     wâpahta+V+TI+Ind+Prt+12Pl: kikîwâpahtênaw, kikî-wâpahtênaw
     wâpahta+V+TI+Ind+Prt+2Pl: kikîwâpahtênâwâw, kikî-wâpahtênâwâw
     wâpahta+V+TI+Ind+Prt+3Sg: kîwâpahtam, kî-wâpahtam
     wâpahta+V+TI+Ind+Prt+3Pl: kî-wâpahtamwak, kîwâpahtamwak
     wâpahta+V+TI+Ind+Prt+4Pl: kî-wâpahtamiyiwa, kîwâpahtamiyiwa
